Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.010

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to:

(1) Promote the health, safety, and welfare of international student exchange visitors in Washington in accordance with uniform national standards;

(2) Promote quality education and living experiences for international student exchange visitors living in Washington;

(3) Promote international awareness among Washington residents, by encouraging Washington residents to interact with international student exchange visitors;

(4) Encourage public confidence in international student exchange visitor placement organizations operating in Washington;

(5) Encourage and assist with compliance with United States information agency regulations and nationally established standards; and

(6) Promote the existence and quality of international student visitor exchange programs operating in Washington.

[ 1991 c 128 s 1.]